Louisiana, session 2026, SB318.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1517(B)(1) and the introductory paragraph of (2) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 47:1517(G) and 1517.3 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1517. Tax exemption budget
* * *
B.(1) The annual tax exemption budget shall be published on the LaTrac
Department of Revenue's website, or any subsequent database that may replace the
LaTrac system, and shall include the following:
(a) Each tax exemption, and its statutory citation, and its purpose.
(b) The revenue loss to the state caused by each tax exemption for the three
preceding years, the estimated revenue loss to the state caused by each tax exemption
for the current fiscal year, and the estimated revenue loss to the state caused by each
tax exemption for the ensuing fiscal year.
(c) The estimated cost of administering and implementing each tax exemption
for the three preceding fiscal years, the current fiscal year, and the ensuing fiscal
year.
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 318 ENROLLED
(d) The tax exemption budget shall also include the following:
(i) The number of businesses which receive each tax exemption, credit,
exclusion, refund, preferential tax rate, deferred tax liability, or rebate, hereinafter
referred to in this Subsection as the exemption.
(ii) The parish or location of each business which receives a tax exemption;
provided, that if fewer than ten businesses receive a particular tax exemption, the tax
exemption budget may group such tax exemption with another tax exemption which
also has fewer than ten businesses receiving it.
(iii) The information shall be displayed in a manner that identifies:
(aa) The industry group by North American Industry Classification System
sector.
(bb) The number of taxpayers by industry.
(cc) The total tax burden by industry group by individual tax before the
exemption.
(dd) The total value to each industry group for each exemption.
(ee) The total tax value by each industry group by individual tax of the tax
collections after the exemption.
(e) The items contained in Subparagraph (d) of this Paragraph shall be
published to the extent that the information is available to the department, on a
schedule to be determined by the secretary of the department, beginning with the
incentive expenditures, and fully implemented by the date of publication of the
Fiscal Year 2018-2019 tax exemption budget on or before March 1, 2020. The
secretary shall ensure that the publication shall not include confidential information.
(2) The tax exemptions Each tax exemption in the annual tax exemption
budget shall also be organized in an additional opening schedule as follows
classified into one of the following categories:
* * *
G.(1) The single sales and use tax collector for each parish shall prepare
and submit a tax exemption budget for all exclusions, exemptions, deductions,
credits, rebates, and preferential tax treatments applicable to the local sales and
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 318 ENROLLED
use taxes it administers in accordance with requirements in Paragraph (B)(1)
of this Section. The tax exemption budget required by this Subsection shall be
prepared annually and submitted to the governor and the legislature no later
than March first of each year, in the same manner and form as required for the
tax exemption budget prepared by the Department of Revenue pursuant to this
Section.
(2)(a) Each collector shall submit the information required by this
Subsection to the Louisiana Uniform Local Sales Tax Board, which shall
compile, review, and transmit the information to the governor and the
legislature.
(b) The Louisiana Uniform Local Sales Tax Board may adopt rules and
establish procedures necessary to implement the provisions of this Subsection,
including standardized reporting formats and deadlines for submission by local
collectors.
* * *
§1517.3. Business tax benefit report
A. No later than the first day of September of each year, the secretary of
the Department of Revenue shall prepare and submit to the governor and the
legislature a business tax benefit report in the manner set forth in this Section.
B. The business tax benefit report shall include a listing of each tax
exemption as defined in R.S. 47:1517(E) that provides tax savings or a financial
benefit to businesses. The report shall not include tax treatments required by
federal law, including those relating to interstate commerce, or provisions that
are part of the general tax structure of the tax system rather than enacted to
provide a targeted tax preference.
C. The information shall be displayed in a manner that identifies all of
the following:
(1) The industry group by North American Industry Classification
System sector.
(2) The number of taxpayers by industry.
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 318 ENROLLED
(3) The total tax burden by industry group by tax type before the
exemption.
(4) The total value to each industry group for each exemption.
(5) The total tax burden by industry group by tax type after the
exemption.
D. The items required by this Section shall not include confidential
information.
Section 2. R.S. 47:1517(B)(3) and (4) and (C) and 1517.1(B)(4) are hereby repealed
in their entirety.
Section 3. The first business tax benefit report shall be due on September 1, 2026.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.